South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3456.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  It is proposed that Section 1, Article XI of the Constitution of this State be amended to read: Section 1. There shall be a State Board of Education composed of one member from each of the judicial circuits of the State. The members shall be elected by the legislative delegations of the several counties within each circuit for terms and with such powers and duties as may be provided by law and shall be rotated among the several counties. One additional member shall be appointed by the Governor. The members of the Board shall serve such terms and the Board shall have such powers and duties as the General Assembly shall specify by law.(Reserved) SECTION 2.  The proposed amendment must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next general election for representatives.  Ballots must be provided at the various voting precincts with the following words printed or written on the ballot: "Must Section 1, Article XI of the Constitution of this State, relating to the State Board of Education, be amended so as to provide that the State Board of Education is abolished? Yes     o No      o Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes', and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." ----XX----